Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
GENERAL PARTNERS

7-62-401. Admission of general partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership's original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in writing in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, with the written consent of all partners.

(1.5) A person may be admitted as a general partner to a limited partnership either upon formation of the limited partnership or thereafter without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership or acquiring a partnership interest, if in either case such admission is pursuant to a written partnership agreement or other writing confirming the admission.

Upon the withdrawal of the last remaining general partner, unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement for the admission of a general partner, one or more persons who consent to be general partners shall be admitted as follows:

A majority of the limited partners may admit one or more general partners; and

If a majority of the limited partners fails to act within a reasonable time, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the limited partnership's principal office is located, or, if the limited partnership has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the limited partnership has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver shall, upon the application of any limited partner, admit one or more general partners. Such court may appoint a custodian to manage the business of the limited partnership during the pendency of the proceedings.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to a limited partnership formed prior to June 3, 1997, if on or before one year after June 3, 1997, one or more partners signs and delivers to a general partner an election in writing against the application of subsection (2) of this section. The general partner shall file any such election with the records required to be kept by section 7-62-105. The absence of such an election in the records shall give rise to a presumption that no such election has been delivered.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 442, § 1, November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 455, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1500, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(2)(b) amended, p. 2246, § 137, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1130, § 6, effective May 14.

7-62-402. Events of withdrawal.

A person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in section 7-62-602;

The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as provided in section 7-62-702;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement or unless all partners give their consent in writing at the time, the general partner:

Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

Is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent;

Files a petition or answer seeking for the general partner any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation;

Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the general partner in any proceeding of this nature; or

Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of the general partner's properties;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement or unless all partners give their consent in writing at the time, if, one hundred twenty days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed; or if, within ninety days after the appointment without the general partner's consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of the general partner's properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed; or if, within ninety days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is an individual:

The general partner's death; or

The appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the general partner;

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the substitution of a new trustee);

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of articles of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter or articles of incorporation; or

In the case of a general partner that is an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate's entire interest in the partnership.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 442, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

IP(1)(d) and (1)(e) amended, p. 455, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d)(IV), (1)(d)(V), (1)(d)(VI), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, p. 1442, § 132, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(i) amended, p. 19, § 4, effective August 5.

7-62-403. General powers and liabilities.

Except as provided in this article or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this article:

A general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners; and

A general partner of a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a limited liability partnership to persons other than the partnership and the other partners.

Except as provided in this article or in the partnership agreement:

A general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners; and

A general partner of a limited liability limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a limited liability partnership to the partnership and to the other partners.

For a limited partnership that has made the election permitted by section 7-62-1104, the article so elected shall be the governing law for purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. For a limited partnership that has not made the election permitted by section 7-62-1104, article 60 of this title shall be the governing law for purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 443, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 400, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 788, § 14, effective May 24.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 916, § 6, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2004:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1443, § 133, effective July 1.

7-62-404. Contributions by a general partner.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of the person's participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 443, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1443, § 134, effective July 1.

7-62-405. Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote (on a per capita or any other basis), separately or with all or any class of the limited partners on any matter.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 443, § 1, November 1.